North Carolina statutes. Chapter 165. Veterans.
Article 1. Department of Administration. [Repealed]

§§ 165-1 through 165-4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

History.

G.S. 165-1

; 1967, c. 1060, s. 1; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1977, c. 70, s. 27; repealed by 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015. G.S. 165-2; 1967, c. 1060, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 27; repealed by 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015. G.S. 165-3; 1945, c. 723, s. 1; 1949, c. 430, s. 1; 1967, c. 1060, s. 1; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1977, c. 70, s. 27; 2011-183, s. 112; repealed by 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015. G.S. 165-4; 1945, c. 723, s. 1; 1967, c. 1060, s. 1; repealed by 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

Revision of Article.

Session Laws 1967, c. 1060, s. 1, rewrote the former Article, which also consisted of 11 sections and was derived from Session Laws 1945, c. 723, s. 1; c. 1087; 1949, c. 430, ss. 1, 2; c. 1292; 1951, c. 1048, ss. 1, 2; 1957, c. 541, s. 19. Where sections were similar to prior provisions, the historical citations were added thereto.

Editor’s Note.

Former G.S 165-1 pertained to North Carolina Veterans Commission renamed. Former G.S 165-2 pertained to references changed. Former G.S 165-3 pertained to definitions. Former G.S 165-4 pertained to purpose.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

§ 165-5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 620, s. 9.

§ 165-6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

History.

1945, c. 723, s. 1; 1949, c. 1292; 1967, c. 1060, s. 1; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1985, c. 757, s. 61(a); 2009-280, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 30.1; repealed by 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 165-6

pertained to the powers and duties of the department.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(ww), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), made the repeal of this section effective July 1, 2015.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

§ 165-7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 620, s. 9.

§ 165-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

History.

1945, c. 723, s. 1; 1967, c. 1060, s. 1; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1977, c. 70, s. 27; repealed by 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 165-8

pertained to quarters.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(ww), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), made the repeal of this section effective July 1, 2015.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

§ 165-9.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-1214 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 165-10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

History.

1945, c. 723, s. 1; 1967, c. 1060, s. 1; 2011-401, s. 3.25; repealed by 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 165-10

pertained to the transfer of veterans’ activities.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(ww), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), made the repeal of this section effective July 1, 2015.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 3.25, effective November 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Commerce, Division of Employment Security” for “North Carolina Employment Security Commission” at the end.

§§ 165-11,
165-11.1.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-1215 and 143B-1216 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(e), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.